Massachusetts, session 194th, S457.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 - There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth, the 
Commonwealth Middle School Innovation Fund, the purpose of which shall be to provide grants 
and other support to programs administered by local school districts that engage project-centered 
group learning methods in grades 5-8 that integrate multiple areas of subject matter including but 
not limited to science and mathematics, promote learning among students at various skill levels, 
and seek to comport with the requirements of time on learning as contained in statute and 
regulations promulgated by the department of elementary and secondary education, including but 
not limited to 603 CMR 27.00. 
Such grants may be used for purposes including but not limited to personnel costs, 
curriculum development and design, and materials. 
Section 2 - Amounts shall be credited to the fund from legislative appropriation, gifts, 
grants, and other sources, provided that the department of elementary and secondary education 

of 3 13 shall work to identify and secure such grants to the maximum feasible extent. Amounts 
contained in the fund shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain available for 
expenditure by the department, which shall promulgate regulations to distribute such grants in a 
fair and equitable manner. In doing so the department shall consider factors including but not 
limited to geographic distribution, distribution across the range of sizes of local school districts 
across the commonwealth, and maximizing the impact of such grants in developing programs 
and curriculum that are replicable and sustainable for such districts. 
Section 3 - The fund shall be administered by the department, which shall develop and 
maintain the Commonwealth Middle School Innovation Council for the purposes of  advising the 
department for the purposes of maximizing the effectiveness, sustainability, and practicality of 
programs funded in whole or in part by such grants.  Said council shall be chaired by the 
commissioner of the department, and shall also include the secretary of education and the 
secretary of energy and economic development, and 9 additional members to be appointed by the 
governor, 1 of whom shall represent the Massachusetts Association of School Committees, 1 of 
whom shall represent the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents, 3 of whom shall 
represent middle school educators from diverse geographic regions in the commonwealth, 1 of 
whom shall represent local charitable education foundations, 2 of whom shall represent parents 
of middle school students in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall represent an an organized labor 
organization representing educators in the commonwealth, and 1 of whom shall represent an 
institution of higher learning in the commonwealth with expertise in education and science, 
mathematics, and engineering.  The council shall meet not less than twice per calendar year, 
provided that its meetings shall be public and shall provide for remote observation by the public 
through electronic means. 

of 3 36  Section 4 -  The department shall produce an annual report detailing the amounts and 
recipients of grants pursuant to this section, any innovative programs developed or supported by 
such grants, opportunities for replication of such programs, and any legislative or regulatory 
recommendations to improve or support the work of the fund. Said report shall be filed with the 
clerks of the House and Senate, whom shall post them electronically for public inspection, not 
later than December 31 of each calendar year.